Illinois, session 104th, SB3905.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Behavior Analyst Licensing Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 6/1)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)8    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 9Behavior Analyst Licensing Act.10(Source: P.A. 102-953, eff. 5-27-22.)